Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 3

Board of Mayor and Aldermen

6-3-101. Election of board — Municipalities incorporating under chapters 1-4 of this title after June 30, 1991 — Ward boundaries.

Any municipality incorporating under this charter after June 30, 1991, shall have at least one (1) ward but not more than eight (8) wards. Any municipality having a population of less than five thousand (5,000) shall, upon incorporation, have one (1) ward, and its board shall consist of a mayor and two (2) aldermen elected at large. Any municipality having a population of more than five thousand (5,000) shall, upon incorporation, have two (2) wards, and its board shall consist of a mayor to be elected at large and two (2) aldermen elected from each ward. The mayor and aldermen elected to the first board shall serve the four-year and two-year terms prescribed by § 6-1-207(b). At each election thereafter the mayor and aldermen shall be elected to four-year terms, except in transitional elections prescribed by subsection (c). Any municipality that incorporated under this charter after June 30, 1991, and that has a population of less than five thousand (5,000) and has only one (1) ward, may by ordinance increase the number of aldermen to a maximum of four (4) without increasing the number of wards. The ordinance shall provide for staggered four-year terms in accordance with § 6-1-207(b), but may provide for transitional terms of less than four (4) years.

Any municipality incorporated after June 30, 1991, may increase or reduce the number of wards, except that municipalities having a population of more than five thousand (5,000) shall not reduce the number of wards below two (2). The board of any municipality having between one (1) and four (4) wards shall consist of a mayor elected at large and two (2) aldermen elected from each ward, except that municipalities having more than one (1) ward may reduce the number of aldermen from each ward from two (2) to one (1). The board of any municipality having between five (5) and eight (8) wards shall consist of a mayor elected at large and one (1) alderman elected from each ward. In wards having more than one (1) alderman, the aldermen shall serve staggered terms of office within their wards.

Any municipality that has only one (1) ward may provide by ordinance for numerical designations for aldermanic positions. After numerical positions have been designated, candidates for alderman shall qualify by indicating on the qualifying petition the position the candidate is seeking. Ballots shall indicate the position to be filled by the selection of candidates listed under “Alderman, position 1,” “Alderman, position 2,” and so on. Any qualified person residing in the municipality may seek an open aldermanic position, but may qualify in any election for only one (1) position.

All increases and reductions in the number of wards and aldermen under this section shall be accomplished only by ordinance passed by a two-third (2/3) vote of the entire membership to which the board is entitled. The ordinance shall:

Take effect at the next municipal election, but shall not affect the present terms of members of the board of mayor and aldermen;

Where appropriate, establish and describe the new ward boundaries;

Provide for a transitional election following the adoption of the ordinance in which the mayor or aldermen, or both, running for office shall be elected for terms that will expire at the next municipal election;

At the second municipal election following the adoption of the ordinance provide for a system of staggered terms of office under which the mayor is elected for a term of four (4) years, in cities with an even number of wards one half (½) the total number of mayor and aldermen running for office are elected to four-year terms, in cities with an uneven number of wards one (1) more or one (1) less than one half (½) the total number of mayor and aldermen running for office, are elected to four-year terms, in both classes of cities the remaining aldermen are elected to two-year terms, and following which all aldermen shall be elected for four-year terms; and

In the case of a ward that has been abolished, provide that any alderman whose term extends past the life of a ward shall serve as an alderman at large for the remainder of the term.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1992, ch. 612, §§ 3, 4; 1996, ch. 652, § 1; 1997, ch. 77, § 1; 2003, ch. 261, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-3-102. Election of board by municipalities incorporated under chapters 1 and 2 of this title, on or prior to June 30, 1991. [Amendment Contingent on Municipality Approval. See the Compiler's Notes].

A municipality incorporated under chapters 1 and 2 of this title, on or before June 30, 1991, may, by ordinance, establish wards, increase or decrease the number of wards, increase or decrease the number of aldermen to no fewer than two (2) and no more than eight (8) in accordance with § 6-3-101.

Any municipality that has only one (1) ward may provide by ordinance for numerical designations for aldermanic positions. After numerical positions have been designated, candidates for alderman shall qualify by indicating on the qualifying petition the position the candidate is seeking. Ballots shall indicate the position to be filled by the selection of candidates listed under “Alderman, position 1,” “Alderman, position 2,” and so on. Any qualified person residing in the municipality may seek an open aldermanic position, but may qualify in any election for only one (1) position.

A municipality whose board has staggered two-year terms may by ordinance change to staggered four-year terms. The ordinance, which shall take effect for the next municipal election and shall not affect the present terms of members of the board of mayor and aldermen, shall provide for the transitional election of some members of the board for three-year terms. After this initial election, all members of the board shall be elected for four-year terms.

A municipality whose board has nonstaggered two-year terms may by ordinance change to staggered four-year terms. The ordinance, which shall take effect for the next municipal election and shall not affect the present terms of members of the board, shall provide for the transitional election of some members of the board for two-year terms. After this initial election, all members of the board shall be elected for four-year terms.

A municipality whose board has nonstaggered four-year terms may by ordinance change to staggered four-year terms. The ordinance, which shall take effect for the next municipal election and shall not affect the present terms of members of the board, shall provide for the transitional election of some members of the board for either two-year or six-year terms. After this initial election, all members of the board shall be elected for four-year terms.

A municipality whose board has staggered two-year terms may, by ordinance, change to nonstaggered two-year terms. The ordinance, which shall take effect for the next municipal election and shall not affect the present terms of members of the board of mayor and aldermen, shall provide that the members elected at the next election will serve transitional terms of three (3) years. After such election, all members of the board shall be elected to serve two-year terms.

A municipality whose board has non-staggered or staggered four-year terms may, by ordinance, change to two-year non-staggered or staggered terms. The ordinance shall not affect the present terms of members of the board serving four-year terms, and shall take effect for the next appropriate municipal election following the adoption of the ordinance. After such election, all members of the board shall be elected to serve two-year terms.

A municipality whose board has nonstaggered two-year terms may by ordinance change to nonstaggered four-year terms. The ordinance shall take effect for the next municipal election and shall not affect the present terms of members of the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, any municipality incorporated under this charter that is located within two (2) counties and has a population of not less than one thousand four hundred fifty (1,450) nor more than one thousand four hundred seventy-five (1,475), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may by ordinance provide for the election of its mayor to a four-year term and the election of its aldermen to staggered four-year terms beginning with municipal elections that are conducted after January 1, 2001.

Nothing in subdivision (c)(1) shall be construed as having the effect of removing any incumbent from office or abridging the term of any official prior to the end of the term for which such official was elected.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1992, ch. 612, §§ 5-7; 1994, ch. 574, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 691, § 1; 1998, ch. 954, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 613, § 1; 2003, ch. 261, § 2; 2007, ch. 90, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 613, § 2 provided that the act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of any municipality within two (2) counties and has a population of not less than one thousand four hundred fifty (1,450) nor more than one thousand four hundred seventy-five (1,475) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such municipality and certified to the Secretary of State.

For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. § 6-3-102(b)(5), a city could change the term of office of all the members of its board of mayor and aldermen to two-year terms, but no statute authorizes the city to shorten the mayor's term to two years while leaving the other members with four-year staggered terms, OAG 05-151, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 153 (9/30/05).

6-3-103. Residence requirements for officers.

No person shall be eligible for the office of mayor unless such person has resided within the municipality for at least one (1) year next preceding the election.

No person shall be eligible for the office of alderman unless such person has resided within the ward for at least one (1) year next preceding the election.

Residence within any area annexed in a year preceding an election shall be counted in meeting the residence requirement of this section.

Any officer moving from such officer's ward, in the case of an alderman, or moving from the municipality, in the case of the mayor, during the term of office shall be presumed to have vacated the office, and it shall be declared vacant, and filled as provided in § 6-3-107.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Payment of mayor's salary during voluntary leave of absence, OAG 98-0127, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (7/20/98).

Residency requirements in T.C.A. § 6-3-103 do not apply in cities incorporated under private acts, OAG 06-055, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (3/28/06).

6-3-104. Dates for municipal elections.

The board may by ordinance change the date of municipal elections to coincide with the August or November general election. The ordinance changing the election date shall provide for the extension of the terms of members of the board necessary to meet the election date, but no term may be extended for more than two (2) years beyond its regular expiration date.

Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which an elected official was selected.

If the board changes the date of municipal elections pursuant to subsection (a), the board may at a later date change the election date back to what such date was prior to moving the election date to coincide with the August or November general election. The board may only make an election date change under this subsection (c) one (1) time. Terms of incumbent members of the board shall not be abridged to accomplish an election date change under this subsection (c); however, members elected at a date change pursuant to this subsection (c) may take office at a later date so as to not abridge terms of incumbent members. If such members take office at a later date, their term may be abridged due to such members having to take office at the later date.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 2010, ch. 1008, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of municipal charter amendment that extends term of elected officials, OAG 00-017, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/8/00).

6-3-105. Oaths of office.

The mayor, after the mayor's election, shall take an oath of office to support the constitution of the state and faithfully discharge the duties of the mayor's office, before any officer authorized to administer oaths. This officer or the mayor shall then induct the aldermen into office by administering to them a similar oath of office. Oaths of office shall be filed in the archives of the municipality.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

6-3-106. Duties of mayor.

The mayor:

Shall be the chief executive officer of the municipality and shall preside at meetings of the board;

Shall communicate any information needed, and recommend measures the mayor deems expedient to the board;

Shall make temporary appointments of any officer or department head as those terms are defined in § 6-1-101, except that of alderman, arising from the absence, sickness or disability of any such officer or department head, and shall report such appointment to the board at its next regular meeting;

The board may confirm or reject the mayor's temporary appointments, or, at its discretion, make its own temporary appointments. The board shall make appointments to fill vacancies in office;

May call special meetings of the board upon adequate notice to the board and adequate public notice;

Shall state the matters to be considered at the special meeting and the action of the board shall be limited to those matters submitted;

Shall countersign checks and drafts drawn upon the treasury by the treasurer and sign all contracts to which the municipality is a party;

As a member of the board, may make motions and shall have a vote on all matters coming before the board; and

Shall make appointments to boards and commissions as authorized by law.

Unless otherwise designated by the board by ordinance, the mayor shall perform the following duties or may designate a department head or department heads to perform any of the following duties:

Those duties set forth in § 6-4-101, if the board does not appoint a city administrator, or if someone else is not designated by the board to perform those duties;

Employ, promote, discipline, suspend and discharge all employees and department heads, in accordance with personnel policies and procedures, if any, adopted by the board;

Nothing in this charter shall be construed as granting a property interest to employees or department heads in their continued employment;

Act as purchasing agent for the municipality in the purchase of all materials, supplies and equipment for the proper conduct of the municipality's business; provided, that all purchases shall be made in accordance with policies, practices and procedures established by the board;

Prepare and submit the annual budget and capital program to the board for their adoption by ordinance; and

Such other duties as may be designated or required by the board.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1992, ch. 612, § 8; 1997, ch. 27, §§ 1, 3.

6-3-107. Vice mayor — Vacancies in office.

The board shall elect an alderman to the office of vice mayor, who shall serve as mayor when the mayor is absent or unable to discharge the duties of the mayor's office, and, in case of a vacancy in the office of mayor, until the next regular municipal election.

By affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining members, the board shall fill a vacancy in the office of alderman for the unexpired term, but any portion of an unexpired four-year term for alderman or mayor that remains beyond the next municipal election shall be filled by the voters at that election, if the vacancy occurs at least twenty (20) days before the latest time for filing nominating petitions for candidates in that election.

All such elections by the board shall be made by voice vote, on the calling of the roll. If a tie vote occurs in filling a vacancy on the board, the presiding officer shall vote a second time to break the tie.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1992, ch. 612, § 9.

6-3-108. Election of alderman as presiding officer.

In the absence of the mayor and vice mayor, the board may elect an alderman to act as presiding officer.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 27, § 2.

6-3-109. Compensation.

The compensation of all officers shall be established in the ordinance adopting the annual budget and capital program.

The compensation of the mayor may not be diminished during the mayor's term of office.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Payment of mayor's salary during voluntary leave of absence, OAG 98-0127, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (7/20/98).

6-3-110. Establishment of term limits for the mayor and board of mayor and aldermen of certain municipalities by ordinance.

Subject to the further provisions of this section, the board of mayor and aldermen of any municipality incorporated under this charter which is located within a county that has adopted a charter form of government is authorized upon its own initiative and upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two-thirds (2/3) vote at two (2) separate meetings to establish term limits for the mayor and board of mayor and aldermen of such municipality in such manner as shall be designated by the ordinance. The operation of the ordinance shall be subject to approval of the voters as required in subsection (b).

Any ordinance to establish term limits for the mayor and board of mayor and alderman of any municipality to which subsection (a) applies shall not become operative until approved in an election herein provided in the municipality. Upon the adoption of the ordinance, the mayor shall notify the county election commission to hold an election as provided in this subsection (b).

After the receipt of a certified copy of such ordinance, the county election commission shall hold an election on the question pursuant to § 2-3-204, providing options to vote “FOR” or “AGAINST” the ordinance, and a majority vote of those voting in the election shall determine whether the ordinance is to be operative.

If the majority vote is for the ordinance, it shall be deemed to be operative on the date that the county election commission makes its official canvass of the election returns; provided, however, that no term limits shall apply until the election of the mayor and board of mayor and aldermen held after the ordinance is operative.

If the majority vote is against the ordinance, no further elections on the question of term limits shall be held until at least four (4) years have expired from the previous election and only after the board of mayor and aldermen adopts a new ordinance for such purposes in accordance with subsection (a).

Acts 2010, ch. 999, § 1.